Oklahoma, session 2025, SB977.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1024.6 of Title 21, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For the purposes of this act:


1. “Lewd acts” means any sexual behavior imitating sex or


sexual acts, groping, indecent exposure of genitalia or sexual


paraphernalia, display of replicas of genitalia, sexually touching


oneself or someone else, or convincing or forcing someone else to


sexually touch or observe sexual behavior; and


2. “Obscene material” shall have the meaning as provided in


subsection B of Section 1024.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.

Req. No. 44 Page 1


B. No political subdivision of this state shall allow or permit


a public display of lewd acts or obscene material in a public place


including, but not limited to, parades, shows, concerts, plays, or


any other activity where a minor could witness such lewd acts or


obscene material. No individual shall be allowed to show lewd acts


or obscene material in a public place where any other individual


could witness such lewd acts or obscene material. A political


subdivision acting in good faith in accordance with the requirements


of this subsection shall not be liable for acts of an individual or


group in violation of this section.


C. Any individual intentionally displaying lewd acts or obscene


material in front of a minor shall be guilty of a felony. Any


person may have a cause of action against such individual who


intentionally commits such acts in any manner in which a minor was


exposed to the lewd act or obscene material, or an individual was


unwillingly exposed to the lewd act or obscene material.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-44 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:47:03 AM











Req. No. 44 Page 2